Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.310

Loan originator license—Requirements for issuance—Denial—Validity—Expiration—Surrender—Interim license.

(1) The director shall issue and deliver a loan originator license if, after investigation, the director makes the following findings:

(a) The loan originator applicant has paid the required license fees;

(b) The loan originator applicant has met the requirements of RCW 19.146.300;

(c) The loan originator applicant has never had a license issued under this chapter or any similar state statute revoked except that, for the purposes of this subsection, a subsequent formal vacation of a revocation is not a revocation;

(d)(i) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court within seven years of the filing of the present application; and

(ii) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court at any time preceding the date of application if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering;

(e) The loan originator applicant has passed a written examination whose content shall be established by rule of the director;

(f) The loan originator applicant has not been found to be in violation of this chapter or rules;

(g) The loan originator applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a belief that the business will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, an applicant has not demonstrated financial responsibility when the applicant shows disregard in the management of his or her financial condition. A determination that an individual has shown disregard in the management of his or her financial condition may include, but is not limited to, an assessment of: Current outstanding judgments, except judgments solely as a result of medical expenses; current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings; foreclosures within the last three years; or a pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three years;

(h) The loan originator licensee has completed, during the calendar year preceding a licensee's annual license renewal date, a minimum of eight hours of continuing education as established by rule of the director; and

(i) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, nor the designated broker have provided unlicensed residential mortgage loan modification services in this state in the five years prior to the filing of the present application.

(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1) of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the loan originator license. The director shall notify the loan originator applicant of the denial and return to the loan originator applicant any remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's actual cost to investigate the license.

(3) The director shall issue a new loan originator license under this chapter to any licensee that has a valid license and is otherwise in compliance with this chapter.

(4) A loan originator license issued under this section expires on the date one year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal purposes, is also the renewal date. The director shall establish rules regarding the loan originator license renewal process created under this chapter.

(5) A loan originator licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect the loan originator licensee's civil or criminal liability or any administrative actions arising from acts or omissions occurring before such surrender.

(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a loan originator license and to facilitate the business of a loan originator, an interim loan originator license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued when the director determines that the loan originator has substantially fulfilled the requirements for loan originator licensing as defined by rule.

[ 2010 c 35 s 15; 2009 c 528 s 10; 2006 c 19 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 35: See RCW 31.04.904.

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.